Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1304
Decree for conveyance, release, or acquittance; effect.

When any judgment or decree shall be rendered for a conveyance, release or acquittance, in any court of this state, and the party or parties against whom the judgment or decree shall be rendered do not comply therewith within the time mentioned in said judgment or decree, such judgment or decree shall have the same operation and effect, and be as available as if the conveyance, release or acquittance had been executed conformable to such judgment or decree.

Laws 1869, § 1, p. 70;

R.S.1913, § 7997;

C.S.1922, § 8938;

C.S.1929, § 20-1304;

R.S.1943, § 25-1304.